Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF24.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 145.423, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Recognition; new text begin medical new text end care. deleted text begin Andeleted text end new text begin A born alivenew text end infant deleted text begin who is born alivedeleted text end new text begin as a result of an abortion new text end shall be fully recognized as a human person, and accorded immediate protection under the law. All reasonable measures consistent with good medical practice, including the compilation of appropriate medical records, shall be taken by the responsible medical personnel to deleted text begin care for the infant who is born alivedeleted text end new text begin preserve the life and health of the born alive infantnew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end